apertium-sme-sma.sma.lexc
LEXICON ab-dot-cc
+CC+ABBR:%.%> # ;

! Adding case suffixes to the abbrs in a tentative manner, to test it
! out. The problem with the original treatment represented by the first,
! outcommented member of the two lexica) is that especially intransiv


! Then, as an afterthought, come our two verbs, gč. and vrd.

!LEXICON ab-verb ! A lexicon for "gč." and perhaps also other abbreviated verbs.
! ab-dot-verb ;
! ab-nodot-verb ;
! Not in use
LEXICON ab-dot-verb
+V+ABBR+TV+Imprt:%.%> # ; ! Period.

!LEXICON ab-nodot-verb
! +ABBR+V+TV+Imprt:%> # ; ! No period.
! Not in use.




! The abbreviation lexicon itself
! -------------------------------



! =============================================== !
! Intransitive abbreviations !
! =============================================== !

LEXICON TRNUMAB
! For abbrs for which numerals are complements, but other
! words not necessarily are. This group treats arabic numerals as
! if it were transitive but letters as if it were intransitive.
! TODO: Bug the fact that these abbrs do not distinguish between
! cap and small letters, whereast he ITRAB ones do.



Apd ab-dot ; !
bie ab-dot ;
Bnr ab-dot-noun ; !
Gnr ab-noun ; !
Kommune#nr ab-dot-noun ;
Pb ab-noun ; ! Postbox
!Poastanr ab-dot-noun ;
Post#nr ab-dot-noun ;
Rt ab-dot ; !
S.nr ab-noun ; !
Suohkan#nr ab-dot-noun ;
O.nr ab-noun ; !
alm ab-dot ; !
b ab ; ! b. is a transitive abbr as in geas. 12.! b. 2001.
bnr ab-noun ; !
!čk ab-dot ; !
fnr ab-noun ;
gnr ab-dot-noun ; !
j ab-dot ; !
jnr ab-dot ; !
kap ab-nodot-noun ; !
kap:kap ab-dot-noun ; !
kr ab ; !
!mátke#tlf ab-dot-noun ;
nr ab-noun ; ! Nr nicht !
rieg ab-dot-verb ; !riegádan
s ab-noun ; !
tab:tab ab ; ! or: Add capital Tab. !
dii ab-dot ; !
tlf ab-dot-noun ; !
vnr ab-dot-noun ; !




! =============================================== !
! Transitive abbreviations !
! =============================================== !

LEXICON Punctuation

! Clause boundary symbols

%,+CLB:%,         # ;
%.+CLB:%.         # ;
%.%.+CLB:%.%.     # ;
%.%.%.+CLB:%.%.%. # ;
%:+CLB:%:         # ;
%;+CLB:%;	      # ;
 ^excl+CLB+Use/Circ:%!	  # ;	!
%?+CLB:%?	      # ;
…+CLB:…		      # ;
 ¿+CLB:¿		      # ;	! Only seen as noise.
¶+CLB:¶		      # ;	

•+PUNCT:•	      # ;
 -+PUNCT:-         # ; !hyphen
 --+PUNCT:--       # ; !double hyphen
 –+PUNCT:–         # ; !endash
 —+PUNCT:—         # ; !emdash
=+PUNCT:=         # ;
%%+PUNCT:%%       # ;
&+PUNCT:&         # ;
%"+PUNCT:%"       # ;
'+PUNCT:'         # ;   
%*+PUNCT:%*       # ;
++PUNCT:+         # ;
`+PUNCT:`         # ;
´+PUNCT:´         # ;
/+PUNCT:/         # ; 
+/-+PUNCT:+/-     # ;
%~+PUNCT:%~	      # ;


! Paired punctuation marks

%«+PUNCT+LEFT:%«  # ;
 %»+PUNCT+RIGHT:%» # ; ! XXX Does not work!
%“+PUNCT+LEFT:%“  # ;
%„+PUNCT+LEFT:%„  # ;
%”+PUNCT+RIGHT:%” # ;
%‘+PUNCT+LEFT:%‘  # ;
%’+PUNCT+RIGHT:%’ # ;
%‹+PUNCT+LEFT:%‹  # ;
%›+PUNCT+RIGHT:%› # ;
%(+PUNCT+LEFT:%(  # ;
%)+PUNCT+RIGHT:%) # ;
%[+PUNCT+LEFT:%[  # ;
%]+PUNCT+RIGHT:%] # ;
%{+PUNCT+LEFT:%{  # ;
%}+PUNCT+RIGHT:%} # ;
%<+PUNCT+LEFT:%<  # ;
%>+PUNCT+LEFT:%>  # ;

LEXICON TRAB
bs ab-dot-verb ;
vs ab-dot-cc ; !
